Massachusetts, session 194th, H3757.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 81D of Chapter 41 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “plan” in line 52 the following: -
(10) A Transportation Demand Management (TDM) element, which studies how TDM
programs and collaboration with a local Transportation Management Association (TMA) (either
existing or new) can reduce congestion and improve mobility within the community.
of 1